Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section, “state-sponsored life insurance program” means
the group life insurance program allowed under 37 U.S.C. 707 and exclusively offered to all
members of the Oregon National Guard through the Oregon National Guard Association.
(2) The Adjutant General shall, at the discretion of the Adjutant General:
(a) Allow efforts to make the state-sponsored life insurance  program available to all
members of the Oregon National Guard;
(b) Provide opportunities for members of the Oregon National  Guard to purchase pro-
ducts from the state-sponsored life insurance program; and
(c) Allow representatives  from the state-sponsored life insurance program to provide in-
formation through briefings on the state-sponsored life insurance  program to members of
the Oregon National Guard during active and inactive duty training periods.
Enrolled Senate Bill 803 (SB 803-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 803 (SB 803-INTRO) Page 2